Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1643
Employee; death; coverage continued; conditions; premium rate.

An employer or employer trust group policy or contract delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state which provides coverage to a group which, based on the number of employees, is not a group subject to section 4980B of the Internal Revenue Code and which provides hospital, surgical, or major medical coverage, or any combination of such coverages, on an expense-incurred or service basis by an insurance company or health maintenance organization for employees and their dependents, but not including any policy or contract which provides benefits for specific diseases or for accidental injuries only, shall provide that the covered surviving spouse or covered surviving dependent children whose hospital, surgical, or major medical coverage under the group policy or contract would otherwise be terminated because of the death of such employee shall be entitled to continue such coverage subject to the provisions of the group policy or contract and the following conditions:

(1) Such coverage shall be continued on a monthly renewal basis until the earliest of the following dates:

(a) The date the covered surviving spouse or covered surviving dependent children become eligible for other group hospital, surgical, or major medical coverage, whether insured or self-insured, and with respect to the covered surviving spouse, the date such spouse remarries or the date such spouse becomes eligible for medicare or is covered by medicaid;

(b) The date of expiration of the monthly period for which premiums were paid for the covered surviving spouse or covered surviving dependent children in the event of nonpayment of premium;

(c) The date the covered surviving spouse or covered surviving dependent children exercise any privilege provided under the group policy or contract for conversion to an individual or family policy or contract;

(d) The date on which the group insurance policy or health maintenance organization agreement is terminated or the date the employer or employer trust trustee terminates participation under such policy or agreement; or

(e) The date of expiration of a period of one year following the date the coverage of the deceased employee would otherwise terminate; and

(2) The monthly premium rate to be charged for such coverage shall not exceed one hundred two percent of the total premium which would have been established for such coverage for the covered surviving spouse or covered surviving dependent children had the deceased employee still been a member of the insured group. Such total premium rate shall be paid by the covered surviving spouse or covered surviving dependent children. The experience of such coverage shall be charged to the group policy or contract which is in force.

Laws 1989, LB 318, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 978, § 26;

Laws 1995, LB 574, § 47.